Utah statutes.
63G-1-401.   Commemorative periods.
(1)  The following days shall be commemorated yearly:
(a)  Bill of Rights Day, on December 15;
(b)  Constitution Day, on September 17;
(c)  Yellow Ribbon Day, on the third Monday in May, in honor of men and women
who are serving or have served in the U.S. armed forces around the world in
defense of freedom;
(d)  POW/MIA Recognition Day, on the third Friday in September; and
(e)  Indigenous People Day, the Monday immediately preceding Thanksgiving.
(2)  The Department of Veterans' Affairs shall coordinate activities, special
programs, and promotional information to heighten public awareness and
involvement relating to Subsections (1)(c) and (d).
(3)  The month of November shall be commemorated yearly as American Indian
Heritage Month.
(4)  The first full week of May shall be commemorated yearly as State Water
Week to recognize the importance of water conservation, quality, and supply in
the state.
(5)  January 24, 2011 shall be commemorated as John M. Browning Day.
